Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Wholesaler’s Tax

243.710.
Wholesaler’s tax on distilled spirits.

Each wholesaler shall pay to the Department of Revenue five cents ($0.05) per case on each case of distilled spirits sold by him in the state. This tax shall be computed each month according to the report required to be filed by KRS

243.850

and shall be paid on or before the date in each succeeding month when reports are required to be filed.

History.

2554e-11; amend. 2005, ch. 85, § 656, effective June 20, 2005.